Utah statutes.
34-41-107.   No physician-patient relationship created.
A physician-patient relationship is not created between an employee,
volunteer, prospective employee, or prospective volunteer, and the local
governmental entity, state institution of higher education, or any person
performing the test, solely by the establishment of a drug testing program in
the workplace.
